Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.717

Pendency of proceedings for review of appointment of receiver—Liabilities of credit union—Availability of relevant data.

The pendency of any proceedings for judicial review of the appointment of a receiver may not operate to prevent the payment or acquisition of the share and deposit liabilities of the credit union by the national credit union administration or other insurer or guarantor of the share and deposit liabilities of the credit union. During the pendency of the proceedings, the receiver shall make credit union facilities, books, records, and other relevant credit union data available to the insurer or guarantor as may be necessary or appropriate to enable the insurer or guarantor to pay out or to acquire the insured or guaranteed share and deposit liabilities of the credit union. The national credit union administration and any other insurer or guarantor of the credit union's share and deposit liabilities, together with their directors, officers, agents, and employees, and the director and receiver and their agents and employees, will be free from liability to the credit union, its directors, members, and creditors, for or on account of any action taken in connection with the receivership.

[ 1997 c 397 s 84.]